nl: Fluoridegehalte: Fluoridevrij; Hoog fluoride (>225 ppm); Laag fluoride (<100 ppm); Standaard fluoride (100-225 ppm); Andere
zh-CN: 氟化物含量: 无氟; 高氟 (>225 ppm); 低氟 (<100 ppm); 标准含氟 (100–225 ppm); 其他
bg-BG: Съдържание на флуор: Без флуорид; Висок флуорид (>225 ppm); Нисък флуорид (<100 ppm); Стандартен флуорид (100–225 ppm); Други
vi: Hàm lượng fluoride: không chứa fluoride; Fluoride cao (>225 ppm); Fluoride thấp (<100 ppm); Fluoride tiêu chuẩn (100–225 ppm); Khác
pt-PT: Conteúdo de flúor: Sem flúor; Alto teor de flúor (>225 ppm); Baixo teor de flúor (<100 ppm); Flúor padrão (100-225 ppm); Outro
es: Contenido de flúor: Sin fluoruro; Alto contenido de flúor (>225 ppm); Bajo contenido de flúor (<100 ppm); Flúor estándar (100-225 ppm); Otros
hu: Fluoridtartalom: Fluoridmentes; Magas fluoridtartalom (>225 ppm); Alacsony fluoridtartalom (<100 ppm); Normál fluoridtartalom (100–225 ppm); Egyéb
cs: Obsah fluoridu: Bez fluoru; Vysoký obsah fluoridu (>225 ppm); Nízký obsah fluoridu (<100 ppm); Standardní obsah fluoridu (100–225 ppm); Jiné
en: Fluoride content: Fluoride-free; High fluoride (>225 ppm); Low fluoride (<100 ppm); Standard fluoride (100–225 ppm); Other
tr: Florür içeriği: Florür içermez; Yüksek florür (>225 ppm); Düşük florür (<100 ppm); Standart florür (100–225 ppm); Diğer
it: Contenuto di fluoro: Senza fluoro; Alto contenuto di fluoro (>225 ppm); Basso contenuto di fluoro (<100 ppm); Contenuto standard di fluoro (100-225 ppm); Altro
fi: Fluoridipitoisuus: Fluoriton; Korkea fluoripitoisuus (>225 ppm); Matala fluoripitoisuus (<100 ppm); Normaali fluoripitoisuus (100–225 ppm); Muu
lt-LT: Fluoro kiekis: Be fluorido; Didelis fluoro kiekis (>225 ppm); Mažas fluoro kiekis (<100 ppm); Standartinis fluoro kiekis (100–225 ppm); Kita
da: Fluoridindhold: Fluor-fri; Højt fluorindhold (>225 ppm); Lavt fluorindhold (<100 ppm); Standard fluorindhold (100–225 ppm); Andet
sv: Fluorinnehåll: Fluorfri; Hög fluorhalt (>225 ppm); Låg fluorhalt (<100 ppm); Standard fluorhalt (100-225 ppm); Övrigt
de: Fluoridgehalt: Fluoridfrei; Hoher Fluoridgehalt (>225 ppm); Niedriger Fluoridgehalt (<100 ppm); Standard-Fluoridgehalt (100–225 ppm); Sonstiges
ro-RO: Conținut de fluor: Fără fluor; Fluor ridicat (>225 ppm); Fluor redus (<100 ppm); Fluor standard (100–225 ppm); Altele
pl: Zawartość fluoru: Bez fluoru; Wysoka zawartość fluoru (>225 ppm); Niska zawartość fluoru (<100 ppm); Standardowa zawartość fluoru (100–225 ppm); Inne
nb: Fluorinnhold: Fluorfri; Høyt fluorinnhold (>225 ppm); Lavt fluorinnhold (<100 ppm); Standard fluorinnhold (100–225 ppm); Annet
el: Περιεκτικότητα σε φθόριο: Χωρίς φθόριο; Υψηλό φθόριο (>225 ppm); Χαμηλό φθόριο (<100 ppm); Τυπικό φθόριο (100-225 ppm); Άλλο
pt-BR: Conteúdo de flúor: Sem flúor; Alto teor de flúor (>225 ppm); Baixo teor de flúor (<100 ppm); Teor padrão de flúor (100-225 ppm); Outro
ru: Содержание фтора: Без фтора; Высокое содержание фтора (>225 ppm); Низкое содержание фтора (<100 ppm); Стандартное содержание фтора (100–225 ppm); Другой
hr-HR: Sadržaj fluorida: Bez fluora; Visok sadržaj fluorida (>225 ppm); Nizak sadržaj fluorida (<100 ppm); Standardni sadržaj fluorida (100–225 ppm); Ostalo
fr: Teneur en fluor: Sans fluor; Teneur élevée en fluor (>225 ppm); Faible teneur en fluor (<100 ppm); Fluor standard (100-225 ppm); Autre
sl-SI: Vsebnost fluorida: Brez fluorida; Visoka vsebnost fluorida (>225 ppm); Nizka vsebnost fluorida (<100 ppm); Standardna vsebnost fluorida (100–225 ppm); Drugo
ja: フッ素含有量: フッ素フリー; 高フッ素 (>225 ppm); 低フッ素 (<100 ppm); 標準フッ素 (100–225 ppm); その他
sk-SK: Obsah fluoridu: Bez fluoridu; Vysoký obsah fluoridu (>225 ppm); Nízky obsah fluoridu (<100 ppm); Štandardný obsah fluoridu (100–225 ppm); Iné
ko: 불소 함량: 불소 무첨가; 고불소 (>225 ppm); 저불소 (<100 ppm); 표준 불소 (100-225 ppm); 기타
th: ปริมาณฟลูออไรด์: ปราศจากฟลูออไรด์; ฟลูออไรด์สูง (>225 ppm); ฟลูออไรด์ต่ำ (<100 ppm); ฟลูออไรด์มาตรฐาน (100–225 ppm); อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 含氟量: 無氟; 高氟（>225 ppm）; 低氟（<100 ppm）; 標準氟（100-225 ppm）; 其他